Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.540

Exemptions, exceptions, and preemptions—Burden of proof.

In any proceeding under this chapter, the burden of proving an exemption, an exception from a definition, or a preemption of a provision of this chapter is upon the person claiming it.

[ 1998 c 15 s 21; 1959 c 282 s 54.]